Hawaii, session 2026, HB1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of education is responsible for putting out an annual computer science legislative report every year by June 30th. However, the department of education would like to include quarter four computer science data from the schools in the report, and the current June 30th due date provides too tight a turnaround for the inclusion of that data.  Thus, the department of education would like to push back the due date for the report to the end of the calendar year to provide a more robust computer science report. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to change the due date of the department of education's annual computer science legislative report from June 30 to twenty days prior to the start of the legislative session. SECTION 2. Section 302A-323, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) [By June 30, 2022, and by each June 30 thereafter,] At least twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the superintendent shall submit to the board and legislature a report of the computer science courses and computer science content offered during the previous school year at the schools in each complex area.  The report shall include: (1)  The names and course codes of the computer science courses offered at each school; (2)  The number and percentage of students enrolled in each computer science course and computer science content, disaggregated by: (A)  Gender; (B)  Race and ethnicity; (C)  Special education status, including students eligible for special education under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as amended, or section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended; (D)  English language learner status; (E)  Eligibility for the free and reduced price lunch program; and (F)  Grade level; provided that if a category contains one to five students, or contains an amount that would allow the amount of another category that contains one to five students to be determined, the number of students shall be replaced with a symbol indicating that one to five students fulfilled that particular category; (3)  The names and course codes of the courses containing computer science content and a description of the computer science standards and content that are covered by those courses; and (4)  The number of computer science instructors at each school, disaggregated by: (A)  Any applicable certification; (B)  Gender; (C)  Race and ethnicity; and (D)  Highest academic degree earned." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST